Oregon, session 2026R1, HB4028.
Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. Section 2 of this 2026 Act is added to and made a part of the Insurance Code.
SECTION 2. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Audit” means an on-site or remote review of records of or claims made by a provider
by or on behalf of an insurer.
(b)(A) “Behavioral health treatment” includes:
(i) Mental health treatment and services as defined in ORS 743B.427; and
(ii) Substance use disorder treatment and services as defined in ORS 743B.427.
(B) “Behavioral health treatment” does not include treatment or services provided in:
(i) A hospital;
(ii) A hospital-affiliated clinic, as defined in ORS 442.612; or
(iii) A group medical practice that includes outpatient mental health or substance use
disorder treatment.
(c) “Claim” means a request made by a provider to an insurer to reimburse the cost of
behavioral health treatment provided to a beneficiary of a policy or certificate of health in-
surance offered by the insurer.
(d) “Clerical error” means a minor error in the keeping, recording or transcribing of re-
cords or documents or in the handling of electronic or hard copies of correspondence.
(e) “Fraud” means an intentional misrepresentation made by an individual with the
knowledge that the misrepresentation could result in an unauthorized benefit to the indi-
NOTE: Matter in boldfaced type in an amended section is new; matter [italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in boldfaced type.
LC 48

A-Eng. HB 4028
vidual or to another person.
(f) “Provider” means a person who is licensed, certified or otherwise authorized to pro-
vide behavioral health treatment in this state.
(2) An insurer that offers a policy or certificate of health insurance that reimburses the
cost of behavioral health treatment shall make available to all providers who submit claims
a separate document containing a detailed written description of all requirements for the
successful resolution of a claim that may be audited by the insurer in the future and the
requirements that applied in any previous period during which a claim of the provider was
audited. The description must:
(a) Be written in plain language that is easy to understand and that does not rely on
references to other sources such as statutes or contract provisions;
(b) Provide examples of documentation requirements for the submission of claims;
(c) Identify which requirements may result in recoupment for failure to comply;
(d) Explain which requirements apply to in-network providers and which apply to out-of-
network providers; and
(e) If the requirements differentiate between types of providers, explain the requirements
applicable to each type of provider.
(3) An insurer may not recoup from a provider a payment on a claim if the insurer has
failed to comply with subsection (2) of this section.
(4) An insurer shall notify providers no later than 30 days before the effective date of any
changes made by the insurer to the requirements described in subsection (2) of this section.
An insurer may not demand recoupment of a payment made on a claim based on new re-
quirements if the insurer has failed to comply with this subsection.
(5) An insurer’s audit of a claim:
(a) May not be conducted on any paid claim submitted by a provider on a date more than
12 months earlier or, in the case of suspected fraud, may not be conducted more than six
years after the date payment was made on the claim;
(b) For an audit initiated after payment is made on a claim, must be completed no later
than 180 days from the date the audit is initiated on the claim, unless a provider fails to
submit records in a timely fashion or initiates an appeal of the insurer’s audit finding;
(c) Must be reviewed by a behavioral health professional; and
(d) May not result in reversing or overturning a determination that a service is medically
necessary that was made by the insurer when the claim was submitted or prior authorization
of the service approved, unless the patient was no longer insured at the time the service was
provided.
(6) If an insurer uses sampling or similar methods to determine whether to initiate an
audit of a provider’s claims, the insurer:
(a) May initiate an audit only if the insurer identifies a high probability of an error; and
(b) May recoup from a provider only payments on individual claims for which the insurer
specifically identifies an error.
(7) In the course of an audit initiated prior to payment on a claim, an insurer shall re-
spond to a provider with findings no later than 30 days after the date the provider responds
to the insurer’s request for additional information regarding the claim.
(8) An insurer may not demand recoupment of a payment made on a claim based on a
clerical error.
[2]

A-Eng. HB 4028
(9) If an insurer identifies an error during an audit of a claim that results in the
insurer’s demand for recoupment of the insurer’s payment on the claim, the insurer:
(a) Shall provide a detailed description of the error and allow a provider a reasonable
opportunity of not less than 30 days to rectify the error; and
(b) Shall allow the provider to use a repayment plan of up to three years to repay the
claim unless the recoupment is based on an insurer’s duplicate payment on a claim.
(10) An insurer may not begin a new audit of any claim submitted by a provider while
another audit is in process. A subsequent audit may not be initiated until the provider has
been given the opportunity to correct mistakes identified in the previous audit and complete
any corrective action plan resulting from the previous audit.
(11) An insurer conducting an audit may not structure compensation paid to an employee
or agent conducting an audit in any manner that creates a direct financial incentive to the
employee or agent to identify errors that result in recoupment.
(12) An insurer may not charge a provider for the costs of conducting an audit.
(13) The provisions of this section apply to audits conducted by an insurer and to audits
conducted by a third party on behalf of an insurer.
(14) In the event of an audit dispute between a provider and an insurer, the insurer:
(a) Shall continue to cover medically necessary services for the patient during the dis-
pute, unless the insurer finds clear evidence of fraud or immediate patient safety concerns.
(b) May not hold the patient financially responsible for services deemed medically neces-
sary at the time of delivery, even if the provider is later subject to recoupment.
SECTION 3. Section 4 of this 2026 Act is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 414.
SECTION 4. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Audit” means an on-site or remote review of records of or claims made by a provider
by or on behalf of a coordinated care organization or the Oregon Health Authority.
(b)(A) “Behavioral health treatment” includes:
(i) Mental health treatment and services as defined in ORS 743B.427; and
(ii) Substance use disorder treatment and services as defined in ORS 743B.427.
(B) “Behavioral health treatment” does not include treatment or services provided in:
(i) A hospital;
(ii) A hospital-affiliated clinic, as defined in ORS 442.612; or
(iii) A group medical practice that includes outpatient mental health or substance use
disorder treatment.
(c) “Claim” means a request made by a provider to a coordinated care organization or
the authority to reimburse the cost of behavioral health treatment provided to a member
of the coordinated care organization or to a medical assistance recipient who is not enrolled
in a coordinated care organization.
(d) “Clerical error” means a minor error in the keeping, recording or transcribing of re-
cords or documents or in the handling of electronic or hard copies of correspondence.
(e) “Fraud” means an intentional misrepresentation made by an individual with the
knowledge that the misrepresentation could result in an unauthorized benefit to the indi-
vidual or to another person.
(f) “Provider” means an individual who is licensed, certified or otherwise authorized to
provide behavioral health treatment in this state.
(2) A coordinated care organization and the Oregon Health Authority shall make avail-
[3]

A-Eng. HB 4028
able to all providers all of the following regarding the requirements for the submission of
claims:
(a) Examples of documentation requirements for the submission of claims;
(b) Identification of which requirements may result in recoupment for failure to comply;
(c) An explanation of which requirements apply to in-network providers and which apply
to out-of-network providers; and
(d) If the requirements differentiate between types of providers, an explanation of the
requirements applicable to each type of provider.
(3) A coordinated care organization and the authority shall notify providers no later than
30 days before the effective date of any contract changes by the coordinated care organiza-
tion or changes by the authority to relevant administrative rules.
(4) An audit of a claim:
(a) May not be conducted on any paid claim submitted by a provider on a date more than
three years earlier without an indication of fraud or an improper payment;
(b) Except as provided in subsection (5) of this section, must be completed no later than
180 days from the date an audit is initiated on a claim;
(c) Must be conducted by a behavioral health professional; and
(d) May not result in reversing or overturning a determination that a service is medically
necessary made by a coordinated care organization or the authority when prior authorization
of the service was given.
(5) In the course of an audit, if a coordinated care organization or the authority requests
additional information regarding a claim, the coordinated care organization or the authority
shall respond to a provider with findings no later than 180 days after the date the audit was
initiated, unless an extension is agreed to in writing by all parties.
(6) If a coordinated care organization or the authority identifies an error during an audit
of a claim that results in a demand for recoupment of the payment on the claim:
(a) The coordinated care organization or the authority shall work with the provider on
a repayment plan, if requested.
(b) The provider may request, and is entitled to receive, a revised audit if the provider
has reason to believe that the coordinated care organization or the authority based the
finding of error on an incorrect provision of law.
(7) Unless required by federal law, a coordinated care organization or the authority con-
ducting an audit may not compensate an individual for conducting the audit in an amount
that is based on a percentage of the overpayments recouped or in any other way that creates
a financial incentive to identify errors that result in recoupment.
(8) The provisions of this section apply to audits conducted by a coordinated care organ-
ization and the authority and to audits conducted by a third party on behalf of a coordinated
care organization or the authority.
(9) In the event of an audit dispute between a provider and a coordinated care organiza-
tion or the authority, the coordinated care organization or the authority:
(a) Shall continue to cover medically necessary services for the patient during the dis-
pute, unless the coordinated care organization or the authority finds clear evidence of fraud
or immediate patient safety concerns.
(b) May not hold the patient financially responsible for services deemed medically neces-
sary at the time of delivery, even if the provider is later subject to recoupment.
[4]

A-Eng. HB 4028
SECTION 5. Sections 2 and 4 of this 2026 Act apply to audits initiated on or after January
1, 2027.
SECTION 6. (1) Sections 2 and 4 of this 2026 Act become operative on January 1, 2027.
(2) An insurer, a coordinated care organization and the Oregon Health Authority may
take any action before the operative date specified in subsection (1) of this section that is
necessary to enable the authority to exercise, on and after the operative date specified in
subsection (1) of this section, all of the duties, functions and powers conferred on the au-
thority by sections 2 and 4 of this 2026 Act.
SECTION 7. ORS 743B.427 is amended to read:
743B.427. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Behavioral health benefits” means insurance coverage of mental health treatment and ser-
vices and substance use disorder treatment and services.
(b) “Carrier” has the meaning given that term in ORS 743B.005.
(c) “Fraud” has the meaning given that term in section 2 of this 2026 Act.
[(c)] (d) “Geographic region” means the geographic area of the state established by the Depart-
ment of Consumer and Business Services for the purpose of determining geographic average rates,
as defined in ORS 743B.005.
[(d)] (e) “Health benefit plan” has the meaning given that term in ORS 743B.005.
[(e)] (f) “Median maximum allowable reimbursement rate” means the median of all maximum
allowable reimbursement rates, minus incentive payments, paid for each billing code for each pro-
vider type during a calendar year.
(g) “Medical management” includes policies or practices such as preauthorizations, au-
dits, prepayment reviews, post-payment reviews, clinical reviews, utilization reviews, utili-
zation monitoring or restriction of specific billing codes, reimbursement restriction of
specific billing codes, denial of claims and recoupment of paid claims.
[(f)] (h) “Mental health treatment and services” means the treatment of or services provided to
address any condition or disorder that falls under any of the diagnostic categories listed in the
mental disorders section of the current edition of the:
(A) International Classification of Disease; or
(B) Diagnostic and Statistical Manual of Mental Disorders.
[(g)] (i) “Nonquantitative treatment limitation” means a limitation, such as a medical man-
agement policy or practice, that is not expressed numerically but otherwise limits the scope or
duration of behavioral health benefits.
[(h)] (j) “Substance use disorder treatment and services” means the treatment of or services
provided to address any condition or disorder that falls under any of the diagnostic categories listed
in the substance use section of the current edition of the:
(A) International Classification of Disease; or
(B) Diagnostic and Statistical Manual of Mental Disorders.
(2) Each carrier that offers an individual or group health benefit plan in this state that provides
behavioral health benefits shall conduct an annual analysis of whether the processes, strategies,
specific evidentiary standards or other factors the carrier used to design, determine applicability of
and apply each nonquantitative treatment limitation to behavioral health benefits within each clas-
sification of benefits are comparable to, and are applied no more stringently than, the processes,
strategies, specific evidentiary standards or other factors the carrier used to design, determine ap-
plicability of and apply each nonquantitative treatment limitation to medical and surgical benefits
[5]

A-Eng. HB 4028
within the corresponding classification of benefits.
(3) On or before March 1 of each year, all carriers that offer individual or group health benefit
plans in this state that provide behavioral health benefits shall report to the Department of Con-
sumer and Business Services, in the form and manner prescribed by the department, the following
information:
(a) The specific plan or coverage terms or other relevant terms regarding the nonquantitative
treatment limitations and a description of all mental health or substance use disorder and medical
or surgical benefits to which each such term applies in each respective benefits classification.
(b) The factors used to determine that the nonquantitative treatment limitations will apply to
mental health or substance use disorder benefits and medical or surgical benefits.
(c) The evidentiary standards used for the factors identified in paragraph (b) of this subsection,
when applicable, provided that every factor is defined, and any other source or evidence relied upon
to design and apply the nonquantitative treatment limitations to mental health or substance use
disorder benefits and medical or surgical benefits.
(d) The comparative analyses demonstrating that the processes, strategies, evidentiary standards
and other factors used to apply the nonquantitative treatment limitations to mental health or sub-
stance use disorder benefits, as written and in operation, are comparable to, and are applied no more
stringently than, the processes, strategies, evidentiary standards and other factors used to apply the
nonquantitative treatment limitations to medical or surgical benefits in the benefits classification.
(e) The specific findings and conclusions reached by the insurer with respect to the health in-
surance coverage, including any results of the analyses described in paragraphs (a) to (d) of this
subsection that indicate that the plan or coverage is or is not in compliance with this section.
(f) The number of denials of behavioral health benefits and medical and surgical benefits, the
percentage of denials that were appealed, the percentage of appeals that upheld the denial and the
percentage of appeals that overturned the denial.
(g) The percentage of claims for behavioral health benefits and medical and surgical benefits
that were paid to in-network providers and the percentage of such claims that were paid to out-of-
network providers.
(h) The median maximum allowable reimbursement rate for each time-based office visit billing
code for each behavioral treatment provider type and each medical provider type.
(i) The reimbursement rate in each geographic region for a time-based office visit and the per-
centage of the Medicare rate the reimbursement rate represents, paid to:
(A) Psychiatrists.
(B) Psychiatric mental health nurse practitioners.
(C) Psychologists.
(D) Licensed clinical social workers.
(E) Licensed professional counselors.
(F) Licensed marriage and family therapists.
(j) The reimbursement rate in each geographic region for a time-based office visit and the per-
centage of the Medicare rate the reimbursement rate represents, paid to:
(A) Physicians.
(B) Physician associates.
(C) Licensed nurse practitioners.
(k) For all behavioral health and medical and surgical claims, the criteria used to select
any claim that includes office visit billing codes for medical management or investigation for
[6]

A-Eng. HB 4028
fraud.
(L) Medical management policies or practices that monitor or restrict provider utilization
of particular behavioral health or medical and surgical office visit billing codes.
(m) The number and percentage of the total annual claims that include behavioral health
or medical and surgical office visit billing codes subject to medical management, listed by
each type of medical management policy or practice.
(n) Any deviation in the methodology used to determine the reimbursement for a behav-
ioral health or medical and surgical office visit billing code that differs from the methodology
used to reimburse other office visit billing codes.
[(k)] (o) The specific findings and conclusions of the carrier under subsection (2) of this section
demonstrating compliance with ORS 743A.168 and the Paul Wellstone and Pete Domenici Mental
Health Parity and Addiction Equity Act of 2008 (P.L. 110-343) and rules adopted thereunder.
[(L)] (p) Other data or information the department deems necessary to assess a carrier’s com-
pliance with mental health parity requirements.
(4) Each carrier that offers an individual or group health benefit plan in this state that
provides behavioral health benefits and conducts medical management shall provide to the
behavioral health provider in writing:
(a) The type and purpose of the medical management policy or practice;
(b) The criteria used to select the provider for review;
(c) Whether the provider may be subject to delays of future payments or recoupments
of past payments; and
(d) An attestation that the medical management policy or practice utilized is being ap-
plied with the same frequency to a medical or surgical classification of benefits as described
by ORS 743A.168 and the Paul Wellstone and Pete Domenici Mental Health Parity and Ad-
diction Equity Act of 2008 (P.L. 110-343).
[(4)] (5) All documents provided to, disclosed to or obtained by the Department of Consumer and
Business Services pursuant to subsection (3) of this section are provided, disclosed or obtained for
the purpose of administering the Insurance Code and shall be confidential and not subject to public
disclosure, as provided in ORS 705.137.
[(5)] (6) No later than September 15 of each calendar year, the department shall report to the
interim committees of the Legislative Assembly related to mental or behavioral health, in the man-
ner provided in ORS 192.245, a summary of the information reported under subsection (3) of this
section, including the department’s overall comparison of carriers’ coverage of mental health treat-
ment and services and substance use disorder treatment and services to carriers’ coverage of med-
ical or surgical treatments or services.

[7]